Washington statutes.
RCW 31.45.020

Application of chapter.

(1) This chapter does not apply to:

(a) Any financial institution or trust company authorized to do business in Washington;

(b) The cashing of checks, drafts, or money orders by any person who cashes checks, drafts, or money orders as a convenience, as a minor part of its customary business, and not for profit;

(c) The issuance or sale of checks, drafts, or money orders by any corporation, partnership, or association that has a net worth of not less than three million dollars as shown by audited financial statements; and

(d) The issuance or sale of checks, drafts, money orders, or other commercial paper serving the same purpose by any agent of a corporation, partnership, or association described in (c) of this subsection.

(2) Upon application to the director, the director may exempt a person from any or all provisions of this chapter upon a finding by the director that although not otherwise exempt under this section, the applicant is not primarily engaged in the business of cashing or selling checks and a total or partial exemption would not be detrimental to the public.

[ 2003 c 86 s 2; 1994 c 92 s 275; 1991 c 355 s 2.]